California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
“If you have been personally served with a temporary restraining order or emergency protective order and notice of hearing, but you do not appear at the hearing either in person or by counsel, and a restraining order or protective order is issued at the hearing that does not differ from the prior temporary restraining order or protective order except with respect to the duration of the order, a copy of the order will be served upon you by mail at the following address: ____ . If that address is not correct or if you wish to verify that the temporary order was made permanent without substantive change, call the clerk of the court at ____.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 365, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

213.7.

(a) The court shall order that any party enjoined pursuant to Section 213.5, 304, 362.4, or 726.5 be prohibited from taking any action to obtain the address or location of a protected party or a protected party’s family members, caretakers, or guardian, unless there is good cause not to make that order.

(b) The Judicial Council shall promulgate forms necessary to effectuate this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 472, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

214.

In each instance in which a provision of this chapter authorizes the execution by any person of a written promise to appear or to have any other person appear before the probation officer or before the juvenile court, any willful failure of such promissor to perform as promised constitutes a misdemeanor and is punishable as such if at the time of the execution of such written promise the promissor is given a copy of such written promise upon which it is clearly written that failure to appear or to have any other person appear as promised is punishable as a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

215.

As used in this chapter, unless otherwise specifically provided, the term “probation officer” or “social worker” shall include the juvenile probation officer or the person who is both the juvenile probation officer and the adult probation officer, and any social worker in a county welfare department or any social worker in a California Indian tribe or any out-of-state Indian tribe that has reservation land that extends into the state that has authority, pursuant to an agreement with the department concerning child welfare services or foster care payments under the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program when supervising dependent children of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 272 by order of the court under Section 300, and the term “department of probation” shall mean the department of juvenile probation or the department wherein the services of juvenile and adult probation are both performed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1054, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

216.

This chapter shall not apply:

(a) To any person who violates any law of this state defining a crime, and is at the time of such violation under the age of 18 years, if such person thereafter flees from this state. Any such person may be proceeded against in the manner otherwise provided by law for proceeding against persons accused of crime. Upon the return of such person to this state by extradition or otherwise, proceedings shall be commenced in the manner provided for in this chapter.

(b) To any person who violates any law of another state defining a crime, and is at the time of such violation under the age of 18 years, if such person thereafter flees from that state into this state. Any such person may be proceeded against as an adult in the manner provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1547) of Title 12 of Part 2 of the Penal Code. The magistrate shall, for purposes of detention, detain such person in juvenile hall if space is available. If no space is available in juvenile hall, the magistrate may detain such person in the county jail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

217.

(a) The board of supervisors of any county or the governing body of any city may by ordinance provide that any personal property with a value of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) in the possession of the sheriff of the county or in the possession of the police department of the city which have been unclaimed for a period of at least 90 days may, instead of being sold at public auction to the highest bidder pursuant to the provisions of Section 2080.5 of the Civil Code, be turned over to the probation officer, to the welfare department of the county, or to any charitable or nonprofit organization which is authorized under its articles of incorporation to participate in a program or activity designed to prevent juvenile delinquency and which is exempt from income taxation under federal or state law, or both, for use in any program or activity designed to prevent juvenile delinquency.

(b) Before any property subject to this section is turned over to the probation officer, to the welfare department of the county, or to any charitable or nonprofit organization, the police department or sheriff’s department shall notify the owner, if his or her identity is known or can be reasonably ascertained, that it possesses the property, and where the property may be claimed. The owner may be notified by mail, telephone, or by means of a notice published in a newspaper of general circulation which it determines is most likely to give notice to the owner of the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 233, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

218.

In any case in which, pursuant to this chapter, the court appoints counsel to represent any person who desires but is unable to employ counsel, counsel shall receive a reasonable sum for compensation and for necessary expenses, the amount of which shall be determined by the court, to be paid out of the general fund of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

218.5.

All counsel performing duties under this chapter, including, but not limited to, county counsel, court appointed counsel, or volunteer counsel, shall participate in mandatory training on domestic violence where available through existing programs at no additional cost to the county. The training shall meet the requirements of Section 16206.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1139, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

219.

The board of supervisors of a county may provide a ward of the juvenile court engaged in rehabilitative work without pay, under an assignment by order of the juvenile court to a work project in a county department, with workers’ compensation benefits for injuries sustained while performing such rehabilitative work, in accordance with Section 3364.55 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

219.5.

(a) No ward of the juvenile court or Department of Youth and Community Restoration, shall perform any function that provides access to personal information of private individuals, including, but not limited to: addresses; telephone numbers; health insurance, taxpayer, school, or employee identification numbers; mothers’ maiden names; demand deposit account, debit card, credit card, savings or checking account numbers, PINs, or passwords; social security numbers; places of employment; dates of birth; state or government issued driver’s license or identification
 numbers; United States Citizenship and Immigration Services-assigned numbers; government passport numbers; unique biometric data, such as fingerprints, facial scan identifiers, voice prints, retina or iris images, or other similar identifiers; unique electronic identification numbers; address or routing codes; and telecommunication identifying information or access devices.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall apply to a person who has been adjudicated to have committed an offense described by any of the following categories:

(1) An offense involving forgery or fraud.

(2) An offense involving misuse of a computer.

(3) An offense for which the person is required
 to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code.

(4) An offense involving any misuse of the personal or financial information of another person.

(c) If asked, any person who is a ward of the juvenile court or the Department of Youth and Community Restoration, and who has access to any personal information, shall disclose that the person is a ward of the juvenile court or the Department of the Youth Authority before taking any personal information from anyone.

(d) Any program involving the taking of personal information over the telephone by a person who is a ward of the juvenile court or the Department of Youth and Community Restoration, shall be subject to random monitoring of those
 telephone calls.

(e) Any program involving the taking of personal information by a person who is a ward of the juvenile court or the Department of Youth and Community Restoration, shall provide supervision at all times of the ward’s activities.

(f) This section shall not apply to wards in employment programs or public service facilities where incidental contact with personal information may occur.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 62.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

220.

(a) A condition or restriction shall not be imposed upon the obtaining of an abortion by an individual detained in any local juvenile facility, pursuant to Sections 1 and 1.1 of Article I of the California Constitution and the Reproductive Privacy Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code), other than those contained in those provisions. Individuals found to be pregnant and desiring abortions, shall be permitted to determine their eligibility for an abortion pursuant to law, and if determined to be eligible, shall be permitted to obtain an abortion.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “local juvenile
 facility” means any city, county, or regional facility used for the confinement of juveniles for more than 24 hours.

(c) The rights provided by this section shall be posted in at least one conspicuous place to which all committed persons capable of becoming pregnant have access.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 136, Sec. 24.   (AB 260)   Effective September 26, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

221.

(a) A person confined in a state or local juvenile facility shall, without needing to request, be allowed to continue to use materials necessary for personal hygiene with regard to the person’s menstrual cycle and reproductive system. A person confined in a state or local juvenile facility shall, upon request, be allowed to continue to use materials necessary for birth control measures as prescribed by the person’s physician.

(b) A person confined in a state or local juvenile facility shall, upon
 the person’s request, be furnished by the confining state or local agency with information and education regarding prescription birth control measures.

(c) Family planning services shall be offered to a person confined in a state or local juvenile facility at least 60 days prior to a scheduled release date. Upon request, a person shall be furnished by the confining state or local agency with the services of a licensed physician, or the person shall be furnished by the confining state or local agency or by any other agency which contracts with the confining state or local agency, with services necessary to meet the person’s family planning needs at the time of
 the person’s release.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “local juvenile facility” means a city, county, or regional facility used for the confinement of juveniles for more than 24 hours.

This section shall become operative on January 1, 1988.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 939, Sec. 3.   (AB 1810)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

222.

(a) A female in the custody of a local juvenile facility shall have the right to summon and receive the services of a physician and surgeon of her choice in order to determine whether she is pregnant. If she is found to be pregnant, she is entitled to a determination of the extent of the medical services needed by her and to the receipt of those services from the physician and surgeon of her choice. Expenses occasioned by the services of a physician and surgeon whose services are not provided by the facility shall be borne by the female.

(b) A ward who is known to be pregnant or in recovery from delivery shall not be restrained except as provided in Section 3407 of the Penal Code.

(c) For purposes of this section, “local juvenile facility” means a city, county, or regional facility used for the confinement of juveniles for more than 24 hours.

(d) The rights provided to females by this section shall be posted in at least one conspicuous place to which all female wards have access.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   (AB 2530)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

223.

(a) (1) The parents or guardians of any minor in the custody of the state or the county, if they can reasonably be located, shall be notified within 24 hours by the public officer responsible for the well-being of that minor, of any serious injury or serious offense committed against the minor, upon reasonable substantiation that a serious injury or offense has occurred.

(2) This section shall not apply if the minor requests that his or her parents or guardians not be informed and the chief probation officer or the Director of the Youth Authority, as appropriate, determines it would be in the best interest of the minor not to inform the parents or guardians.

(b) For purposes of this section, “serious offense” means any offense that is chargeable as a felony and that involves violence against another person. “Serious injury” means, for purposes of this section, any illness or injury that requires hospitalization, is potentially life threatening, or that potentially will permanently impair the use of a major body organ, appendage, or limb.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 496, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

223.1.

(a) (1) At least one individual who is a parent, guardian, or designated emergency contact of a person in the custody of the Division of Juvenile Facilities, if the individual can reasonably be located, shall be successfully notified within 24 hours by the public officer responsible for the well-being of that person, of any suicide attempt by the person, or any serious injury or serious offense committed against the person. In consultation with division staff, as appropriate, and with concurrence of the public officer responsible for the well-being of that person, the person may designate other persons who should be notified in addition to, or in lieu of, parents or guardians, of any suicide attempt by the person, or any serious injury or serious offense committed
 against the person.

(2) This section shall not apply if either of the following conditions is met:

(A) A minor requests that his or her parents, guardians, or other persons not be notified, and the director of the division facility, as appropriate, determines it would be in the best interest of the minor not to notify the parents, guardians, or other persons.

(B) A person 18 years of age or older does not consent to the notification.

(b) Upon intake of a person into a division facility, and again upon attaining 18 years of age while in the custody of the division, an appropriate staff person shall explain, using language clearly understandable to the person, all of the provisions of this section, including that the person has the right to (1) request
 that the information described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) not be provided to a parent or guardian, and (2) request that another person or persons in addition to, or in lieu of, a parent or guardian be notified. The division shall provide the person with forms and any information necessary to provide informed consent as to who shall be notified. Any designation made pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the consent to notify parents, guardians, or other persons, and the withholding of that consent, may be amended or revoked by the person, and shall be transferable among facilities.

(c) Staff of the division shall enter the following information into the ward’s record, as appropriate, upon its occurrence:

(1) A minor’s request that his or her parents, guardians, or other persons not be notified of an emergency pursuant to this section, and the determination of the
 relevant public officer on that request.

(2) The designation of persons who are emergency contacts, in lieu of parents or guardians, who may be notified pursuant to this section.

(3) The revocation or amendment of a designation or consent made pursuant to this section.

(4) A person’s consent, or withholding thereof, to notify parents, guardians, or other persons pursuant to this section.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Serious offense” means any offense that is chargeable as a felony and that involves violence against another person.

(2) “Serious injury” means any
 illness or injury that requires hospitalization, requires an evaluation for involuntary treatment for a mental health disorder or grave disability under the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5), is potentially life threatening, or that potentially will permanently impair the use of a major body organ, appendage, or limb.

(3) “Suicide attempt” means a self-inflicted destructive act committed with explicit or inferred intent to die.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 185.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

223.2.

(a) The unpaid outstanding balance of any county-assessed or court-ordered costs imposed before January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 207.2, 903, or 903.1, former Section 903.15, or Section 903.2, 903.25, 903.4, or 903.5 against the parent, guardian, or other person liable for the support of a minor is vacated and shall be unenforceable and uncollectable if the minor was adjudged to be a ward of the juvenile court, was on probation pursuant to Section 725, was the subject of a petition filed to adjudge the minor a ward, or was the subject of a program of supervision undertaken pursuant to Section 654. This subdivision applies to dual status children for purposes of delinquency jurisdiction.

(b) The unpaid outstanding balance of any county-assessed or court-ordered costs imposed before January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 729.9 against a minor is vacated and shall be unenforceable and uncollectable. This subdivision applies to dual status children for purposes of delinquency jurisdiction.

(c) The unpaid outstanding balance of any county-assessed or court-ordered costs imposed before January 1, 2018, pursuant to Sections 1203.016, 1203.1ab, and 1208.2 of the Penal Code against adults who at the time were not adults who were over 21 years of age and were under the jurisdiction of the criminal court is vacated and shall be unenforceable and uncollectable.

(d) Upon the expiration of 10 years after the date of imposition of a restitution fine pursuant to Section
 730.6 against a minor, any outstanding balance, including any collection fees, is vacated and shall be unenforceable and
 uncollectable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 805, Sec. 5.   (AB 1186)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

224.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) Federally recognized tribes are sovereign nations with inherent rights to self-governance. Federally recognized tribes have the sole authority to determine their tribal membership or citizenship, and this includes the right to regulate domestic relations involving their members or citizens. The federal government recognizes its trust relationship with federally recognized tribes and the unique political status of federally recognized tribes and their
 members or citizens. It is the policy of the State of California to support, protect, and uplift inherent tribal sovereignty. Tribes have been protecting and caring for their children from time immemorial. The State of
 California is committed to protecting essential tribal relations and the political status of federally recognized tribes by recognizing a tribe’s right to protect the health, safety, and welfare of its members or citizens. 

(2) There is no resource that is more vital to the continued existence and integrity of Indian tribes than their children, and the State of California has an interest in protecting Indian
 children, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 224.1. Child welfare and juvenile justice data demonstrates that Indian children involved in the child welfare and juvenile justice systems have better outcomes when they are connected to their family, extended family, tribe, Indian community, and culture. The state is committed to protecting the essential tribal relations and best interest of an Indian child by promoting practices, in accordance with the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.) and other applicable state and federal law, designed to prevent their involuntary out-of-home placement and, whenever that placement is
 necessary, by placing the child, whenever possible, in a placement that reflects the unique values of the child’s tribal culture and is best able to assist the child in establishing, developing, and maintaining a political, cultural, and social relationship with the child’s tribe and tribal community.

(3) It is in the interest of an Indian child that the child’s membership or citizenship in the child’s Indian tribe and connection to the tribal community be encouraged and protected, regardless of whether the child is in the physical custody of an Indian parent or Indian custodian at the commencement of an Indian child custody proceeding, the parental rights of the child’s parents have been terminated, or where the child has resided or been domiciled.

(b) Despite
 the passage of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978, Senate Bill 678 (Stats. 2006, Ch. 838), and Assembly Bill 3176 (Stats. 2018, Ch. 833), California continues to experience inconsistent implementation of the Indian Child Welfare Act and its related state law protections, thus continuing the harm and breakup of Indian families. Variation in practice undermines tribal sovereignty, furthers destructive impacts on tribes and tribal communities, puts the lives of Indian children and families at disproportionate risk for multiple adverse outcomes, and fails to address systemic racism.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to create a comprehensive act to protect and preserve Indian families in California and to aid in improving implementation of applicable state and federal laws. This act will retain California’s heightened standards, protections,
 and services and supports for Indian children. This act shall hereafter be known as the California Indian Child Welfare Act and shall include all provisions in this code, the Family Code, Health and Safety Code, and the Probate Code involving an Indian child to maintain clarity and consistency in provisions with application to Indian children, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 224.1. Existing provisions, and any future amendments to provisions, applicable to Indian children in this code, the Family Code, the Health and Safety Code, or the Probate Code, or amending or creating programs designed to support tribes or tribal organizations, Indian children, and parents or Indian custodians of Indian children, as these terms
 are defined in Section 224.1, in their participation in Indian child custody proceedings shall be considered part of the California Indian Child Welfare Act. 

(d) In all Indian child custody proceedings, as defined in the federal Indian Child Welfare Act and subdivision (d) of Section 224.1, the court shall consider all of the findings contained in subdivision (a), strive to promote the stability and security of Indian tribes and families, comply with the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 and other applicable federal law, and shall seek to protect the best interest of the child. Whenever an Indian child is removed from a foster care home or institution, guardianship, or adoptive placement for the purpose of further foster care, guardianship, or adoptive placement, placement of the child shall be in accordance with the federal
 Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 and other applicable state and federal law.

(e) A determination by an Indian tribe that an unmarried person, who is under the age of 18 years, is either (1) a member or citizen of an Indian tribe or (2) eligible for membership or citizenship in an Indian tribe and a biological child of a member or citizen of an Indian tribe shall constitute a significant political affiliation with the tribe and shall require the application of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 and other applicable state and federal law to the proceedings.

(f) (1) In any proceeding in which the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 applies, the Indian child’s tribe shall have the right to examine all reports or other documents filed with the court,
 including, but not limited to, the reports or other documents upon which any decision to place the Indian child in the custody of someone other than a parent or Indian custodian, or terminate parental rights, will be based.

(2) In any proceeding in which the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 applies where the Indian child’s tribe does not formally intervene, representatives of the Indian child’s tribe described in subdivision (f) of Section 827 shall have the right to inspect the case file, as described in subdivision (e) of Section 827, and representatives of the Indian child’s tribe as described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), and in subdivision (f), of Section 827 have the right to copies of documents contained in and information related to the juvenile case file, subject to any other confidentiality laws. 

(g) In any case in which this code or other applicable state or federal law provides a higher standard of protection to the rights of the parent or Indian custodian of an Indian child, or the Indian child’s tribe, than the rights provided under the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978, the court shall apply the higher standard.

(h) Any Indian child, the Indian child’s tribe, or the parent or Indian custodian from whose custody the child has been removed, may petition the court to invalidate an action in an Indian child custody proceeding for foster care or guardianship placement or termination of parental rights if the action violated Section 1911, 1912, or 1913 of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 1.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

224.1.

(a) As used in this division, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Indian” means any person who is a member or citizen of an Indian tribe, as defined in paragraph (4), or who is an Alaska Native and a member or citizen of a Regional Corporation as defined in Section 1606 of Title 43 of the United States Code.

(2) “Indian custodian” means any Indian person who has legal custody of an Indian child under tribal law or custom or under state law or to whom temporary physical care, custody, and control
 have been transferred by the parent of that child.

(3) “Indian organization” means any group, association, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity owned or controlled by Indians, or a majority of whose members are Indians.

(4) “Indian tribe” means any Indian tribe, band, nation, or other organized group or community of Indians recognized as eligible for the services provided to Indians by the Secretary of the Interior because of their status as Indians, including any Alaska Native village as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1602 of Title 43 of the United States Code.

(5) “Reservation” has the same meaning as “Indian country” as defined in Section 1151 of Title 18 of the
 United States Code, and any lands that are not covered under Section 1151 and the title to which is either held by the United States in trust for the benefit of any Indian tribe or individual or held by any Indian tribe or individual subject to a restriction by the United States against alienation.

(6) “Tribal court” means a court with jurisdiction over child custody proceedings, and that is either a Court of Indian Offenses, a court established and operated under the code or custom of an Indian tribe, or any other administrative body of a tribe that is vested with authority over child custody proceedings.

(b) As used in this division, the term “Indian child” means all of the
 following:

(1) Any unmarried person who is under 18 years of age and who is either of the following:

(A) A member or citizen of an Indian tribe.

(B) Eligible for membership or citizenship in an Indian tribe and is a biological child of a member or citizen of an Indian tribe. 

(2) As used in connection with an Indian child custody proceeding, as defined in subdivision (d), brought in a juvenile court, the term “Indian child” also means an unmarried person who is 18 years of age or over, but under 21 years of age, who is a member or citizen of an Indian tribe or eligible for membership
 or citizenship in an Indian tribe and is the biological child of a member or citizen of an Indian tribe, and who is under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, unless that person or their attorney elects not to be considered an Indian child for purposes of the Indian child custody proceeding. All Indian child custody proceedings involving persons 18 years of age and older shall be conducted in a manner that respects the person’s status as a legal adult.

(c) As used in connection with an Indian child custody proceeding,
 as defined in subdivision (d), the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Extended family member” has the same meaning as defined by the law or custom of the Indian child’s tribe or, in the absence of such law or custom, shall be a person who has reached 18 years of age and who is the Indian child’s grandparent, aunt or uncle, brother or sister, brother-in-law or sister-in-law, niece or nephew, first or second cousin, or stepparent.

(2) “Parent” means any biological parent or parents of an Indian child or any Indian person who has lawfully adopted an Indian child, including adoptions under tribal law or custom.

(d) (1) “Indian child custody proceeding” means a hearing other than an
 emergency proceeding under Section 319, during a juvenile court proceeding brought under this code, including, but not limited to, any hearing pursuant to Section 366.26, or a proceeding under the Probate Code or the Family Code, involving an Indian child, that may culminate in one of the following outcomes:

(A) Foster care placement, which includes removal of an Indian child from their parent, parents, or Indian custodian for placement in a foster home, institution, the home of a guardian or conservator, or anyone other than one of the child’s parents, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), or the child’s Indian custodian, in which the parent or Indian custodian may not have the child returned upon demand, but in which parental rights have not been terminated. Foster care placement includes placement in the home of a legal
 guardian under the provisions of the Family Code, Probate Code, and the Welfare and Institutions Code. Foster care placement does not include an emergency placement of an Indian child pursuant to Section 309, as long as the emergency proceeding requirements set forth in Section 319 are met.

(B) Termination of parental rights, which includes any action involving an Indian child resulting in the termination of the parent-child relationship.

(C) Preadoptive placement, which includes the temporary placement of an Indian child in a foster home or institution after the termination of parental rights, but prior to, or in lieu of, adoptive placement.

(D) Adoptive placement, which includes the permanent placement of an
 Indian child for adoption, or a tribal customary adoption as described in Section 366.24, including any action resulting in a final decree of adoption.

(E) If a child is placed in foster care or another out-of-home placement as a result of a status offense, that status offense proceeding is considered an Indian child custody proceeding.

(2) “Indian child custody proceeding” does not include a voluntary foster care or guardianship placement if the parent or Indian custodian retains the right to have the child returned upon demand.

(e) (1) “Indian child’s tribe” means the Indian tribe in which an Indian child is a member or citizen or eligible for membership or citizenship, or in the case of an Indian
 child who is a member or citizen of, or eligible for membership or citizenship in, more than one tribe, the Indian tribe with which the Indian child has the more significant contacts.

(2) In the case of an Indian child who meets the definition of “Indian child” through more than one tribe, deference should be given to the tribe of which the Indian child is already a member or citizen, unless otherwise agreed to by the tribes.

(3) If an Indian child meets the definition of “Indian child” through more than one tribe because the child is a member or citizen of more than one tribe or the child is not a member or citizen but is eligible for membership or citizenship in more than one tribe, the court shall provide the tribes the opportunity to determine which tribe shall be designated
 as the Indian child’s tribe.

(4) If the tribes are able to reach an agreement, the agreed-upon tribe shall be designated as the Indian child’s tribe.

(5) If the tribes are unable to reach an agreement, the court shall designate as the Indian child’s tribe, the tribe with which the Indian child has the more significant contacts, taking into consideration all of the following:

(A) Preference of the parents for membership or citizenship of the child.

(B) Length of past domicile or residence on or near the reservation of each tribe.

(C) Tribal membership or citizenship of the child’s custodial parent
 or Indian custodian.

(D) Interest asserted by each tribe in the child custody proceeding.

(E) Whether there has been a previous adjudication with respect to the child by a court of one of the tribes.

(F) Self-identification by the child, if the child is of sufficient age and capacity to meaningfully self-identify.

(6) If an Indian child becomes a member or citizen of a tribe other than the one designated by the court as the Indian child’s tribe under paragraph (5), actions taken based on the court’s determination prior to the child’s becoming a tribal member or citizen continue to be valid.

(7) A determination of the Indian child’s tribe for purposes of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act and pursuant to these provisions for purposes of an Indian child custody proceeding, as defined in subdivision (d), does not constitute a determination for any other purpose.

(f) “Active efforts” means affirmative, active, thorough, and timely efforts intended primarily to maintain or reunite an Indian child with their family. If an agency is involved in an Indian child custody proceeding, active efforts shall involve assisting the parent, parents, or Indian custodian through the steps of a case plan and with accessing or developing the resources necessary to satisfy the case plan. To the maximum extent possible, active efforts shall be provided in a manner consistent with the prevailing social and cultural conditions and way of
 life of the Indian child’s tribe and shall be conducted in partnership with the Indian child and the Indian child’s parents, extended family members, Indian custodians, and tribe. When an agency knows a child is an Indian child or has reason to know a child is an Indian child as described in subdivision (d) of Section 224.2, active efforts shall start upon receipt of a referral regarding the Indian child or upon first contact with the Indian child or family, whichever is earlier. Whenever a county child welfare agency is required to make reasonable efforts or provide reasonable reunification services, in any case involving an Indian child, those efforts and services shall meet the standard of active efforts described in this subdivision. Active efforts shall be tailored to the facts and circumstances of the case and may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Conducting a comprehensive assessment of the circumstances of the Indian child’s family, with a focus on safe reunification as the most desirable goal.

(2) Identifying appropriate services, including services offered pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 16585) of Part 4 of Division 9 and helping the parents overcome barriers, including actively assisting the parents in obtaining those services.

(3) Identifying, notifying, and inviting representatives of the Indian child’s tribe to participate in providing support and services to the Indian child’s family and in family team meetings, permanency planning, and resolution of placement issues.

(4) Conducting or causing to be conducted a diligent search for the Indian child’s extended family members, and contacting and consulting with extended family members regarding possible placements and to provide family structure and support for the Indian child and the Indian child’s parents.

(5) Offering and employing all available and culturally appropriate family preservation strategies and facilitating the use of remedial and rehabilitative services provided by the child’s tribe.

(6) Taking steps to keep siblings together whenever possible.

(7) Supporting regular visits with parents or Indian custodians in the most natural setting possible, as well as trial home visits of the Indian child during any period
 of removal, consistent with the need to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the child.

(8) Identifying community resources, including housing, financial assistance, transportation, mental health and substance abuse services, and peer support services, and actively assisting the Indian child’s parents or, when appropriate, the child’s family, in utilizing and accessing those resources.

(9) Monitoring progress and participation in services.

(10) Considering alternative ways to address the needs of the Indian child’s parents and, where appropriate, the family, if the optimum services do not exist or are not available.

(11) Providing postreunification services and
 monitoring.

(g) “Assistant Secretary” means the Assistant Secretary of the Bureau of Indian Affairs.

(h) “Bureau of Indian Affairs” means the Bureau of Indian Affairs of the Department of the Interior.
